District of Columbia statutes.
28:2A-107

Waiver or renunciation of claim or right after default.

Any claim or right arising out of an alleged default or breach of warranty may be discharged in whole or in part without consideration by a written waiver or renunciation signed and delivered by the aggrieved party.

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-128, § 2(b), 39 DCR 3830
1981 Ed., § 28:2A-107.

Uniform Statutory Source:Section 1-107.

Changes: Revised to reflect leasing practices and terminology. This clause is used throughout the official comments to this Article to indicate the scope of change in the provisions of the Uniform Statutory Source included in the section; these changes range from one extreme, e.g., a significant difference in practice (a warranty as to merchantability is not implied in a finance lease (Section 2A-212)) to the other extreme, e.g., a modest difference in style or terminology (the transaction governed is a lease not a sale (Section 2A-103)).

Cross References: Sections 2A-103 and 2A-212.

Definitional Cross References: “Aggrieved party”. Section 1-201(2).

“Delivery”. Section 1-201(14).

“Rights”. Section 1-201(36).

“Signed”. Section 1-201(39).

“Written”. Section 1-201(46).